Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-201
Monuments or memorials; authority to erect.

All counties, townships, cities, and villages of Nebraska may erect or aid in the erection of statues, monuments, or other memorials commemorating the services of the members of the armed forces of the Civil, Spanish-American, or World Wars or the Korean or Vietnam conflict, to be located upon the public lands or within the public buildings within such county, township, city, or village.

Laws 1919, c. 254, § 1, p. 1031;

C.S.1922, § 6812;

C.S.1929, § 80-201;

R.S.1943, § 80-201;

Laws 1987, LB 626, § 1.